Hawaii statutes.
§651-51 Indemnity bond. The sheriff,
deputy sheriff, or police officer may decline to levy upon or sell the alleged
property of any person against whose goods and effects an execution or other
similar writ may issue, unless the party beneficially interested in the writ
shall, upon request, tender to the officer a sufficient bond of indemnity
against all costs and expenses which the officer may sustain in consequence of
seizure or sale of the property, and the claims of third parties. [L 1888, c 8,
§18; am L 1907, c 12, §1; RL 1925, §2453; RL 1935, §4154; RL 1945, §10181; RL
1955, §233-50; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §651-51; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211,
§10; am L 1990, c 281, §11]

Case Notes

Bonds, sureties. 30 H. 658, 663 (1928).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next